Utah statutes.
36-12-20.   Development of proposed energy producer states' agreement -- Membership selection -- Agreements -- Goals -- Meetings -- Reports.

(1)  The speaker of the House shall appoint two members and the president of the Senate shall appoint two members, of which no more than three of the four members shall be from the same political party, to study and work with legislative members of other energy producing states for the purpose of developing a proposed energy producer states' agreement.

(2)  The proposed energy producer states' agreement shall have the following goals:

(a)  to encourage domestic development of energy in the United States;

(b)  to ensure the continued development of each state's domestic natural resources;

(c)  to deliver a unified message to the federal government from energy producing states by:

(i)  participating in the development of proposed federal legislation and regulations; and

(ii)  making recommendations regarding existing federal law and regulations including the following:

(A)  the Environmental Protection Act;

(B)  the Endangered Species Act; and

(C)  federal land access issues that affect the production of energy;

(d)  to eliminate or reduce overly broad federal legislation; and

(e)  to identify and address consequences of delays and cancellations of economically viable energy projects.

(3)  Appointed members shall:

(a)  produce a report with recommendations regarding an energy producer states' agreement; and

(b)  present the report to the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee on or before November 30 of each year.

(4)  Salaries and expenses of the appointed members may be paid in accordance with Section 36-2-2 and Legislative Joint Rules, Title 5, Chapter 3, Expense and Mileage Reimbursement for Authorized Legislative Meetings, Special Sessions, and Veto Override Sessions.

(5)  The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall provide staff assistance as requested.



Amended by Chapter 288, 2013 General Session

